California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------

79772.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of Section 79772 are reallocated to finance the purposes of, and shall be authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with, Division 45 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 4.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79773.

The contaminants that may be addressed with funding pursuant to this chapter may include, but shall not be limited to, nitrates, perchlorate, MTBE (methyl tertiary butyl ether), arsenic, selenium, hexavalent chromium, mercury, PCE (perchloroethylene), TCE (trichloroethylene), DCE (dichloroethene), DCA (dichloroethane), 1,2,3-TCP (trichloropropane), carbon tetrachloride, 1,4-dioxane, 1,4-dioxacyclohexane, nitrosodimethylamine, bromide, iron, manganese, and uranium.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79774.

(a) A project that receives funding pursuant to this chapter shall be selected by a competitive grant or loan process with added consideration for those projects that leverage private, federal, or local funding.

(b) For the purposes of awarding funding under this chapter, a local cost share of not less than 50 percent of the total costs of the project shall be required. The cost-sharing requirement may
 be waived or reduced for projects that directly benefit a disadvantaged community or an economically distressed area.

(c) An agency administering grants or loans for the purposes of this chapter shall assess the capacity of a community to pay for the operation and maintenance of the facility to be funded.

(d) At least 10 percent of the funds available pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated for projects serving severely disadvantaged communities.

(e) Funding authorized by this chapter shall include funding for technical assistance to disadvantaged communities. The agency administering this funding shall operate a multidisciplinary technical assistance program for small and disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79775.

Of the funds authorized by Section 79771, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be made available for competitive grants for projects that develop and implement groundwater plans and projects in accordance with groundwater planning requirements established under Division 6 (commencing with Section 10000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Flood Management [79780. - 79781.]

79780.

The sum of three hundred ninety-five million dollars ($395,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature from the fund, to the Department of Water Resources and the Central Valley Flood Protection Board for the purpose of statewide flood management projects and activities. Funds shall be allocated to multibenefit projects that achieve public safety and include fish and wildlife habitat enhancement. The Department of Water Resources shall make its best effort to
 coordinate this funding with proceeds from Propositions 84 and 1E.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79781.

Of the funds authorized by Section 79780, two hundred ninety-five million dollars ($295,000,000) shall be available to reduce the risk of levee failure and flood in the Delta for any of the following:

(a) Local assistance under the Delta levee maintenance subventions program pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 12980) of Division 6, as that part may be amended.

(b) Special flood protection projects pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310) of Part 4.8 of Division 6, as that chapter may be amended.

(c) Levee improvement projects that increase the resiliency of levees within the Delta to withstand earthquake, flooding, or sea level rise.

(d) Emergency response and repair projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Fiscal Provisions [79785. - 79798.]

79785.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of seven billion one hundred twenty million dollars ($7,120,000,000), and any additional bonds authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with this division pursuant to other provisions of law, or so much thereof as is necessary, not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 79797 may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this division and to
 reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the committee pursuant to this section. The bonds shall be sold upon the terms and conditions specified in a resolution to be adopted by the committee pursuant to Section 16731 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79786.

The bonds authorized by this division shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law, as that law may be amended, apply to the bonds and to this division, except subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code to the extent that those subdivisions conflict with any
 other provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79787.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code) of the bonds authorized by this division, the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this division, the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Finance Committee is the
 “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) The committee consists of the Director of Finance, the Treasurer, and the Controller. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any member may designate a representative to act as that member in his or her place for all purposes, as though the member were personally present.

(c) The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee.

(d) A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79788.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized by this division in order to carry out the actions specified in this division and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79789.

For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, “board,” as defined in Section 16722 of the Government Code, means the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79790.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79791.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this division, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum that is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 79794, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79792.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code for the purpose of carrying out this division less any amount withdrawn pursuant to Section 79794. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division. The board shall execute those documents
 required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79793.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions or is otherwise entitled to any federal tax advantage, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and for the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or
 direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79794.

For the purposes of carrying out this division, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division less any amount borrowed pursuant to Section 79792. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, with
 interest at the rate earned by the moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79795.

All moneys deposited in the fund that are derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this division shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except that amounts derived from premium may be reserved and used to pay the cost of bond issuance prior to any transfer to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79796.

Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the cost of bond issuance shall be paid out of the bond proceeds, including premium, if any. To the extent the cost of bond issuance is not paid from premiums received from the sale of bonds, these costs shall be shared proportionately by each program funded through this division by the applicable bond sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79797.

The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds under this division shall include approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this division or any previously issued
 refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79798.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this division are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, and the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 8.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 27. PURCHASE AND SALE OF ELECTRIC POWER [80000. - 80270.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [80000. - 80016.]

80000.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The furnishing of reliable reasonably priced electric service is essential for the safety, health, and well-being of the people of California. A number of factors have resulted in a rapid, unforeseen shortage of electric power and energy available in the state and rapid and substantial increases in wholesale energy costs and retail energy rates, with statewide impact, to such a degree that it constitutes an immediate peril to the health, safety, life and property of the inhabitants of the state, and the public interest, welfare, convenience and necessity require the state to participate in markets for the purchase and sale of power and energy.

(b) In order for the department to adequately and expeditiously undertake and administer the critical responsibilities established in this division, it must be able to obtain, in a timely manner, additional and sufficient personnel with the requisite expertise and experience in energy marketing, energy scheduling, and accounting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80002.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to reduce or modify any electrical corporation’s obligation to serve. The commission shall issue orders it determines are necessary to carry out this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the department for any procurement cost obligations of any electrical corporation that may have existed as of the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80002.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that power acquired by the department under this division shall be sold to all retail end use customers being served by electrical corporations, and may be sold, to the extent practicable, as determined by the department, to those local publicly owned electric utilities requesting such power. Power sold by the department to retail end use customers shall be allocated pro rata among all classes of customers to the extent practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80003.

(a) The development and operation of a program as provided in this division is in all respects for the welfare and the benefit of the people of the state, to protect the public peace, health, and safety, and constitutes an essential governmental purpose.

(b) This division shall be construed in a manner so as to effectuate the purposes and objectives thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80004.

(a) The powers and responsibilities of the department established under this division are within the scope of the primary duties of the department, but are not governed by the provisions relating to the State Water Resources Development System.

(b) The Department of Water Resources Electric Purchases Fund, established by Section 80200, and the money in that fund are separate and distinct from any other fund and money administered by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80010.

As used in this division, unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Bonds” means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued solely for the purposes of paying the cost of electric power and transmission, scheduling, and other related expenses incurred by the department on and after the effective date of this division, or to reimburse expenditures from the fund for those purposes; repaying to the General Fund any advances made to the department from appropriations made to the fund pursuant hereto or hereafter for purposes of this division, any advances made to the department from the Water Resources Electric Power Fund, and General Fund moneys expended by the department pursuant to the Governor’s Emergency Proclamation dated January 17, 2001; establishing or maintaining reserves in connection with the bonds; costs of issuance of bonds or incidental to their payment or security; capitalized interest; or to renew or refund any bonds.

(b) “Commission” means the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) “Fund” means the Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund established by Section 80200.

(e) “Local publicly owned electric utility” includes the entities defined in subdivision (d) of Section 9604 of the Public Utilities Code and publicly owned utilities that provide electricity.

(f) “Power” means electric power and energy, including, but not limited to, capacity and output, or any of them.

(g) “Public utility” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80012.

The department shall do those things necessary and authorized under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80100) to make power available directly or indirectly to electric consumers in California. Except as otherwise stated, nothing in this division authorizes the department to take ownership of the transmission, generation, or distribution assets of any electrical corporation in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80014.

(a) The department and commission may adopt regulations for purposes of this division as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of that Chapter 3.5, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservations of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the regulations shall be repealed 180 days after their effective date, unless the adopting authority or agency complies with that Chapter 3.5, as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(b) Unless the department determines that application of any such provision to such contracts is detrimental to accomplishing the purposes of this division, the provisions of the Government Code and Public Contract Code applicable to state contracts, including, but not limited to, advertising and competitive bidding requirements and prompt payment requirements, apply to contracts entered into under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80016.

All state agencies and other official state organizations, and all persons connected therewith, shall and are hereby authorized to, at the request of the department, give the department reasonable assistance or other cooperation in carrying out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Power Program [80100. - 80122.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers of the Department [80100. - 80122.]

80100.

Upon those terms, limitations, and conditions as it prescribes, the department may contract with any person, local publicly owned electric utility, or other entity for the purchase of power on such terms and for such periods as the department determines and at such prices the department deems appropriate taking into account all of the following:

(a) The intent of the program described in this division is to achieve an overall portfolio of contracts for energy resulting in reliable service at the lowest possible price per kilowatthour.

(b) The need to have contract supplies to fit each aspect of the overall energy load profile.

(c) The desire to secure as much low-cost power as possible under contract.

(d) The duration and timing of contracts made available from sellers.

(e) The length of time sellers of electricity offer to sell such electricity.

(f) The desire to secure as much firm and nonfirm renewable energy as possible. Prior to commencement of the program described in this division, the department shall assess the need for power in the state in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and local publicly owned electric utilities and electrical corporations in the state and such other entities in the state as the department determines are appropriate. The department may also enter into options or forward contracts with respect to the foregoing, and contract with any person, local publicly owned electric utility, or other entity for transmission, scheduling, and other related power services necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80102.

(a) Contracts under this division may provide for the assignment thereof on any terms and conditions as the contracts may specify.

(b) Any contract for the purchase or sale of electric power shall contain any contractual terms and security provisions as are determined by the department to be necessary or appropriate and the department may enter into such arrangements as may be necessary or appropriate to implement the foregoing.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may pay or provide for the payment of power or use of transmission or distribution facilities and other related services prior to the delivery or utilization thereof, provided that the department determines that prepayment is beneficial to ratepayers and that adequate provision has been made for the security of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80104.

Upon the delivery of power to them, the retail end use customers shall be deemed to have purchased that power from the department. Payment for any sale shall be a direct obligation of the retail end use customer to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80106.

(a) The department may contract with the related electrical corporation or its successor in the performance of related service, for the electrical corporation or its successor in the performance of related service, to transmit or provide for the transmission of, and distribute all power made available by the department, and, as agent of the department, provide billing, collection, and other related services on terms and conditions that reasonably compensate the electrical corporation for its services, and adequately secure payment to the department.

(b) At the request of the department, the commission shall order the related electrical corporation or its successor in the performance of related service, to transmit or provide for the transmission of, and distribute all power made available by the department, and, as agent of the department, provide billing, collection, and other related services on terms and conditions that reasonably compensate the electrical corporation for its services, and adequately secure payment to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 3.   Effective August 13, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80108.

The commission may issue rules regulating the enforcement of the agency function pursuant this division, including collection and payment to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80110.

(a) The department shall retain title to all electricity sold by it to the retail end-use customers. The department shall be entitled to recover, as a revenue requirement, amounts and at the times necessary to enable it to comply with Section 80134, and shall advise the commission as the department determines to be appropriate.

(b) The revenue requirements may also include any advances made to the department hereunder or hereafter for purposes of this division, or from the Department of Water Resources Electric Power Fund, and General Fund moneys expended by the department pursuant to the Governor’s Emergency Proclamation dated January 17, 2001.

(c) (1) For the purposes of this division and except as otherwise provided in this section, the Public Utility Commission’s authority as set forth in Section 451 of the Public Utilities Code shall apply, except any just and reasonable review under Section 451 shall be conducted and determined by the department. Prior to the execution of any modification of any contract for the purchase of electricity by the department pursuant to this division, on or after the effective date of this section, the department or the commission, as applicable, shall do the following:

(A) The department shall notify the public of its intent to modify a contract and the opportunity to comment on the proposed modification.

(B) At least 21 days after providing public notice, the department shall make a determination as to whether the proposed modifications are just and reasonable. The
 determination shall include responses to any public comments.

(C) No later than 70 days before the date of execution of the contract modification, the department shall provide a written report to the commission setting forth the justification for the determination that the proposed modification is just and reasonable, including documents, analysis, response to public comments, and other information relating to the determination.

(D) Within 60 days of the date of receipt of the department’s written report, the commission shall review the report and make public its comments. If the commission in its comments recommends against the proposed modification, the department shall not execute the proposed contract modification.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to the modification of a contract modified to settle litigation
 to which the commission is a party.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to the modification of a contract for the purchase of electricity that is generated from a facility owned by a public agency if the contract requires the public agency to sell electricity to the department at or below the public agency’s cost of that electricity.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to the modification of a contract to address issues relating to billing, scheduling, delivery of electricity, and related contract matters arising out of the implementation by the Independent System Operator of its market redesign and technology upgrade program.

(5) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, the department proposes to “modify” a contract if there is any material change proposed in the terms of the contract.

(B) A change to a contract is not material if it is only administrative in nature or the change in ratepayer value results in ratepayer savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per year. For the purpose of making a determination that a change is only administrative in nature or results in ratepayer savings of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) or less per year, the executive director of the commission shall concur in writing with each of those determinations by the department.

(d) The commission may enter into an agreement with the department with respect to charges under Section 451 for purposes of this division, and that agreement shall have the force and effect of a financing order adopted in accordance with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 840) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, as determined by the
 commission.

(e) The department shall have the same rights with respect to the payment by retail end-use customers for electricity sold by the department as do providers of electricity to the customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 337, Sec. 9.   (SB 695)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

80112.

All money collected with respect to any power acquired and sold pursuant to this division and the Governor’s Emergency Proclamation dated January 17, 2001, and all money paid directly or indirectly to or for the account of the department with respect to any sale, exchange, transfer, or disposition of power acquired pursuant hereto, shall constitute property of the department and shall be deposited in the fund in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 80200. To the extent any moneys are received by an electrical corporation pursuant to Section 80106 in the process of collection, and pending their transfer to the department, they shall be segregated by the electrical corporation on terms and conditions established by the department and shall be held in trust for the benefit of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80116.

The department may sell any power acquired by the department pursuant to this division to retail end use customers, and to local publicly owned electric utilities, at not more than the department’s acquisition costs, including transmission, scheduling, and other related costs, plus other costs as provided in Section 80200, or exchange power with any person or public or private entity. The department may not sell power to any local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in Section 9604 of the Public Utilities Code, which is itself a net seller of power. However, to the extent that any acquired power is not required for use within the state, if it is otherwise advantageous and necessary, the power may be sold, transferred, or otherwise disposed of, or an option may be granted with respect to the power, to any person or public or private entity. Except to maintain system integrity, the department shall sell the power that is to be delivered to retail end use customers within the service area of the electrical corporations that purchase power from the electrical corporations directly to the retail end use customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80120.

The department may fix and establish the procedure and charges for the sale or other disposal of power purchased by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

80122.

The department may do any of the following as may be, in the determination of the department, necessary for the purposes of this division:

(a) Hire and appoint employees as required, at salary levels determined by the director to be competitive to attract and retain persons with the necessary expertise and skills. Prior to hiring or appointing an employee at a salary in excess of a salary approved by the Department of Human Resources, the director shall submit the proposed salary to the Director of Finance who shall submit it to the Legislature in accordance with Section 27.00 of the annual Budget Act. No excess salary authorized under this section may be paid on or after January 1, 2003. The excess portion of a salary authorized under this
 section may not be considered salary in the calculation of final compensation for purposes of benefits under the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(b) Engage the services of private parties to render professional and technical assistance and advice and other services in carrying out the purposes of this division.

(c) Contract for the services of other public agencies.

(d) The State Personnel Board and the Department of Human Resources shall assist the department in expediting the hiring of personnel necessary and desirable for the timely and successful implementation and administration of the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 191.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Bonds [80130. - 80134.]

80130.

(a) The department may incur indebtedness and issue bonds as evidence thereof, provided that bonds may not be issued in an amount the debt service on which, to the extent payable from the fund, is estimated by the department to exceed the amounts estimated to be available in the fund for their payment. 

(b) The department may authorize the issuance of bonds (excluding notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds and retired from the proceeds of those bonds) in an aggregate amount up to the greater of thirteen billion four hundred twenty-three million dollars ($13,423,000,000) or the amount calculated by multiplying by a factor of four the annual revenues generated by the California Procurement Adjustment, as
 determined by the commission pursuant to Section 360.5 of the Public Utilities Code if the aggregate amount does not exceed thirteen billion four hundred twenty-three million dollars ($13,423,000,000).

(c) This section does not prohibit the department from issuing bonds prior to the effective date of this bill based upon the authorization granted to the department by the provisions of Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2001–02 First Extraordinary Session.

(d) (1) Refunding bonds for any of the following purposes shall not be included in the calculation of the aggregate amount:

(A) Refunding bonds to obtain a lower interest rate.

(B) Refunding bonds bearing a variable interest rate with bonds bearing interest at a fixed interest rate.

(C) Refunding bonds if any nationally recognized rating agency reduces or withdraws, or proposes to reduce or withdraw, the rating assigned to securities that are secured by bond insurance policies, credit or liquidity facilities issued by the provider of a bond insurance
 policy, or a credit or liquidity facility securing the bonds being refunded.

(2) All refunding bonds issued by the department under this chapter before January 1, 2010, shall be deemed to have been issued for one or more purposes described in this subdivision and shall not be included in the calculation of the aggregate amount.

(e) In addition, before the issuance of bonds in a public offering, the department shall establish a mechanism to ensure that the bonds will be sold at investment grade ratings and repaid on a timely basis from pledged revenues. This mechanism may include, but is not limited to, an agreement between the department and the commission as described in Section 80110.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 154, Sec. 1.   (AB 1550)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

80132.
